Missouri, session 2026, SB1631.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Chapter 196, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
2 one new section, to be known as section 196.273, to read as
3 follows:
1 196.273. 1. As used in this section, the following
2 terms mean:
3 (1) "Department", the department of health and senior
4 services;
5 (2) "Local authority", a municipality, county, public
6 health authority, or any other political subdivision of this
7 state;
8 (3) "Mobile food unit", any vehicle, trailer, cart, or
9 other conveyance that operates as a food service
10 establishment and is designed to be readily moveable;
11 (4) "Mobile food vendor", any person who dispenses
12 food or beverages from a mobile food unit for immediate
13 service or consumption;
14 (5) "Prepackaged food", any commercially-labeled and
15 processed food that is prepackaged to prevent direct human
16 contact with the food product on distribution from the
17 manufacturer, food facility, or other approved source.

SB 1631 2
18 2. (1) A person shall not operate as a mobile food
19 vendor in this state unless he holds a mobile food vendor
20 license issued by the department. A separate license shall
21 be required for each mobile food unit that a mobile food
22 vendor operates.
23 (2) A license issued by the department under this
24 section shall be valid throughout the state and authorizes
25 operation in any jurisdiction, subject to compliance with
26 the provisions of this section. A local authority shall not
27 prohibit the operation of a mobile food vendor in its
28 jurisdiction if the vendor holds a license issued under this
29 section and complies with all other state and local laws not
30 otherwise in conflict with the provisions of this section.
31 3. The department shall develop a written application
32 for a mobile food vendor license and shall make the
33 application available to applicants in person and on the
34 department's website. The application shall include, at a
35 minimum, the following:
36 (1) The applicant's name, address, and telephone
37 number;
38 (2) The name, address, and telephone number of any
39 associated entity or organization that the applicant is
40 representing and copies of documents verifying that
41 relationship;
42 (3) The applicant's primary residence and business
43 addresses during the twelve months preceding the date of the
44 application;
45 (4) The food or beverages that the applicant proposes
46 to sell to enable the department to establish the
47 applicant's food-type classification;
48 (5) A statement of whether the applicant has
49 previously been denied a mobile food vendor license or has

SB 1631 3
50 had a mobile food vendor license suspended or revoked in
51 another state or local jurisdiction, including the reasons
52 for any denial, suspension, or revocation; and
53 (6) The mobile food unit's vehicle license number,
54 description, identification number, registration, proof of
55 vehicle insurance, and proof of any additional licenses or
56 permits required under state law.
57 4. An applicant may submit one application for all
58 mobile units to be licensed under this section. An
59 applicant's failure to submit a complete application may
60 result in the denial of a license. An applicant shall not
61 intentionally provide false information or intentionally
62 omit requested information on an application.
63 5. The department shall develop a guide on mobile food
64 vendor licensing procedures, which shall be available at the
65 department's office and on the department's website. The
66 guide shall include, at a minimum, the following:
67 (1) Instructions for obtaining, maintaining, and
68 renewing a mobile food vendor license; and
69 (2) A description of the department's standards for
70 inspecting a mobile food unit.
71 6. No later than the fourteenth calendar day following
72 receipt of a completed mobile food vendor license
73 application by the department, the department or a local
74 authority acting under a collaborative agreement under
75 subsection 11 of this section shall conduct a health
76 inspection of each of the applicant's mobile food units
77 listed on the application. The department shall not issue a
78 license to an applicant whose mobile food unit does not pass
79 a health inspection. The department shall ensure that an
80 applicant's mobile food unit is safe for preparing,
81 handling, and selling food, and that an applicant is in

SB 1631 4
82 compliance with all applicable laws of this state. The
83 department may set forth the standards for health
84 inspections by regulation.
85 7. (1) The department shall issue a mobile food
86 vendor license to an applicant who submits a complete
87 application, pays any required fee, and meets the
88 department's licensing requirements and whose mobile food
89 unit passes a health inspection. A license issued under
90 this section shall be renewable annually upon receipt of a
91 license renewal application before the expiration of the
92 previous license. Before the expiration of the license, the
93 department shall send notice of its expiration to the mobile
94 food vendor. A mobile food vendor may continue to operate
95 while the renewal application is pending with the department.
96 (2) A mobile food vendor shall display the mobile food
97 vendor license and health inspection certificate in a
98 conspicuous location for public view.
99 (3) A mobile food vendor license issued under this
100 section shall not be transferrable and shall not authorize
101 the activities of any person other than the person who holds
102 the license. The recipient of any transferred mobile food
103 vendor business assets shall apply for and obtain a new
104 mobile food vendor license before operating as a mobile food
105 vendor.
106 (4) The sale of one mobile food unit identified in a
107 mobile food vendor license application, when replaced by
108 another mobile food unit, shall not invalidate the license
109 or require the issuance of a new license. A license holder
110 who replaces a mobile food unit with another unit shall
111 provide the department with the information required under
112 subsection 3 of this section and shall have the replacement
113 unit inspected as required under subsection 6 of this

SB 1631 5
114 section. The inspection shall be conducted as soon as
115 practicable, but no later than the fourteenth calendar day
116 after the date the department receives the information
117 required under this subsection.
118 8. (1) The department may charge a fee for each
119 mobile food vendor license application submitted and each
120 license issued or renewed under this section. The
121 department may establish a schedule of fees based on the
122 license classification described in subsection 9 of this
123 section. Fees set by the department shall not exceed the
124 amount necessary to cover the costs of administration of
125 this section.
126 (2) The department may charge a fee for a health
127 inspection of an applicant's mobile food unit required under
128 subsection 6 of this section; provided, the fee does not
129 exceed the amount necessary to cover the costs of conducting
130 the inspection.
131 9. The department shall establish by rule the
132 following classifications for mobile food vendors for
133 purposes of conducting health inspections as follows:
134 (1) Mobile food type I vendor for a vendor who
135 dispenses prepackaged foods, does not dispense time or
136 temperature control safety beverages, or poses a low risk of
137 harm to the public;
138 (2) Mobile food type II vendor for a vendor who
139 dispenses food that requires limited handling and
140 preparation;
141 (3) Mobile food type III vendor for a vendor who
142 prepares, cooks, holds, and serves food from a mobile food
143 unit.
144 10. The rules adopted under this section shall specify
145 the categories of foods or beverages that mobile food

SB 1631 6
146 vendors in each classification may serve. A mobile food
147 vendor who seeks to serve food or beverages that may require
148 the vendor's reclassification shall notify the department of
149 the nature of the food or beverages to be sold. The
150 department, or a local authority in a collaborative
151 agreement with the department under subsection 11 of this
152 section, may conduct a health inspection and reclassify the
153 vendor in accordance with the rules adopted under this
154 section.
155 11. (1) The department shall ensure that ongoing,
156 randomized inspections are conducted for each mobile food
157 unit based on the mobile food vendor's classification and
158 previous health inspection results. Upon the request of a
159 local authority, the department may enter into a
160 collaborative agreement with the local authority for
161 conducting health inspections. The department shall
162 reimburse the local authority using moneys collected for
163 health inspection fees under subsection 8 of this section.
164 (2) On a frequency to be determined by the department,
165 a mobile food vendor shall make available to the department
166 a list of all locations at which the vendor intends to
167 operate, to the best of the vendor's knowledge.
168 12. (1) The department or a local authority may
169 investigate a mobile food vendor upon reasonable suspicion
170 that the vendor is violating the provisions of this section
171 or upon receipt of a health or safety complaint. The local
172 authority shall report suspected violations of state law to
173 the department and may recommend that the department suspend
174 or revoke a mobile food vendor license. The mobile food
175 vendor shall cooperate with the department or the local
176 authority during an investigation. Failure to cooperate may
177 result in the suspension or revocation of a license.

SB 1631 7
178 (2) The provisions of this section shall not be
179 construed to impede the department or a local authority when
180 conducting an investigation of a reported food-borne illness.
181 13. The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a
182 mobile food vendor license only if the applicant or license
183 holder commits one or more of the following:
184 (1) Violates the provisions of this section or a rule
185 adopted under this section;
186 (2) Obtains a license by means of fraud,
187 misrepresentation, or concealment of a material fact;
188 (3) Commits fraud or makes a misrepresentation or
189 false statement in connection with the sale of food or
190 beverages while operating as a mobile food vendor; or
191 (4) Other material facts or conditions related to the
192 applicant or application provide reasonable justification
193 for the denial, suspension, or revocation of the license, as
194 determined by the department.
195 14. (1) The department shall provide written notice
196 to an applicant or license holder that the applicant's
197 mobile food vendor application has been denied or that the
198 license may be suspended or revoked. The applicant or
199 license holder may seek a review of any official action of
200 the department that aggrieves the applicant or license
201 holder, including denial, suspension, or revocation, before
202 the administrative hearing commission, as provided in
203 chapter 621.
204 (2) The department may issue an emergency order to
205 suspend a mobile food vendor license if the department has
206 reasonable cause to believe that a license holder's
207 operations pose an imminent threat to the public's health
208 and safety. An emergency suspension order is effective
209 immediately without a hearing on notice to the license

SB 1631 8
210 holder and shall state the length of the suspension. Such
211 emergency orders shall be subject to review before the
212 administrative hearing commission under chapter 621.
213 15. The department shall adopt rules and regulations
214 to implement the provisions of this section; provided, such
215 rules shall not have the following effects:
216 (1) Limit the number of mobile food vendor licenses
217 that the department may issue;
218 (2) Address the hours of operations for mobile food
219 vendors;
220 (3) Restrict a mobile food vendor's propane capacity
221 below the capacity that state law allows for commercial
222 vehicles;
223 (4) Require a mobile food vendor to operate outside of
224 a specific perimeter of a commercial establishment or
225 restaurant;
226 (5) Require a mobile food vendor to enter into any
227 agreement with a commercial establishment or restaurant,
228 except as necessary to properly dispose of grease and other
229 cooking waste;
230 (6) Require a mobile food vendor to have an
231 operational hand-washing sink if the vendor sells only
232 prepackaged food;
233 (7) Require a mobile food vendor to associate with a
234 commissary if the mobile food unit carries the equipment
235 necessary to comply with state law and properly disposes of
236 grease and other cooking waste;
237 (8) Require a mobile food unit to be in constant
238 motion except when serving customers;
239 (9) Require a mobile food vendor to submit to an
240 additional fire inspection of a mobile food unit if the
241 vendor demonstrates that the mobile food unit has passed a

SB 1631 9
242 state or local fire inspection within the preceding twelve
243 months;
244 (10) Require a mobile food vendor to submit to a
245 health inspection other than an inspection that the
246 department, or a local authority under a collaborative
247 agreement, conducts, unless the department is investigating
248 a reported food-borne illness; and
249 (11) Impose inspections, equipment, or operational
250 requirements beyond those established by the department
251 under state law.
252 Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
253 section 536.010, that is created under the authority
254 delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
255 complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
256 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
257 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
258 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
259 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
260 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
261 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
262 or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
263 16. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
264 contrary, the provisions of this section shall preempt any
265 local ordinance, rule, or regulation relating to the
266 licensing or permitting of mobile food vendors or the
267 operation of mobile food units.
268 (2) A local authority shall not require a mobile food
269 vendor holding a valid mobile food vendor license under this
270 section to obtain an additional local permit or license as a
271 condition of operating a mobile food unit.

SB 1631 10
272 (3) A local authority shall not adopt or enforce any
273 ordinance, regulation, or rule that conflicts with or
274 imposes requirements inconsistent with the mobile food
275 vendor license issued under this section.
✓